Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1014.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Advertise" means the use or dissemination of an advertising advertisement by a person that is subject to this act. (b) "Advertising" or "advertisement" means a communication or representation that is disseminated in any manner by any means for the purpose of inducing, or that is likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of a consumer item, good, merchandise, or commodity. (c) "Automatic checkout system" means an electronic device, computer, or machine that determines the price of a consumer item by using a product identity code. An automatic checkout system may but is not required to include an optical scanner. (d) "Consumer item" means an article of tangible personal property used or consumed, or bought for use or consumption, primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. (e) A price is "displayed" for a consumer item if the price is "Displayed" means stamped, affixed, or otherwise marked on the a consumer item ; or the price of the consumer item is displayed , by signage, by an electronic reader, or by any other method that clearly and reasonably conveys the current price of the consumer item , to a consumer when in the store at the place where the item is located. (f) "Final price" means the total price of a consumer item plus any applicable sales or use tax and container deposit collected by the seller on the sale at retail of that consumer item. (g) (f) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, or other legal entity. (h) (g) "Sale at retail" means a transfer of an interest in a consumer item by a person that is regularly and principally engaged in the business of selling consumer items to a buyer for use or consumption and not for resale. (i) (h) "Total price" means the full purchase price of a consumer item, excluding any applicable sales or use tax and container deposit. Sec. 7. (1) If a consumer is engaging in a cash transaction for a consumer item, the person making the sale at retail of that consumer item shall round the final price of the consumer item down to the nearest multiple of 5 cents. Rounding under this subsection does not apply to the calculation of any applicable sales or use tax, which is governed by the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.51 to 205.78, and the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.91 to 205.111, respectively. (2) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), (3), a person shall display the total price of a consumer item offered for sale at retail at the place of the retail sale. (3) (2) Subsection (1) (2) does not apply to any of the following: (a) A consumer item that is sold by weight or volume and is not in a package or container. (b) A consumer item sold in a coin-operated vending machine. (c) Prepared food intended for immediate consumption, as that term is defined in section 4g of the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.54g. (d) A consumer item purchased by mail or through catalog order, or that is not otherwise visible for inspection by the consumer at the time of the sale, and that is ordered or requested by the consumer, if the price of the consumer item is on the consumer's written order or request or on a bill, invoice, or other notice that describes or names the consumer item and is enclosed with the consumer item. (e) An unpackaged food item. (f) A consumer item that has a total weight of not more than 3 ounces, a total volume of not more than 3 cubic inches, and a total price of not more than 30 cents. (g) Live plants. (h) Live animals. (i) Motor vehicles. (j) Motor vehicle parts. (k) Packages of 20 or fewer cigarettes. (l) Greeting cards that are sold individually and have a readable coded price on the back of the card. (m) Merchandise that is ordered as a gift by a consumer and is sent by mail or other delivery service to a person other than the consumer by the retailer at the request of the consumer.